District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0775.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Meals Tax Relief Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Title 47 of the District of Columbia Code is amended as follows:
(a) Section 47-2002(a) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (3)(A) is amended by striking the phrase, “Food or drink prepared
for immediate consumption as defined in § 47-2001(g-1) or spirituous” and inserting the word
“Spirituous” in its place.
(2) A new paragraph (3B) is added to read as follows:
“(3B) The rate of tax on the gross receipts from sales of or charges for food or
drink prepared for immediate consumption as defined in § 47-2001(g-1) shall be 5.0% from the
effective date of the Meals Tax Relief Amendment Act of 2026 to September 30, 2026, and 6.0%
beginning on October 1, 2027, and continuing thereafter.”.
(b) Section 47-2202(a) is amended as follows:


(1) Paragraph (3)(A) is amended by striking the phrase, “Food or drink prepared
for immediate consumption as defined in § 47-2001(g-1) or spirituous” and inserting the word
“Spirituous” in its place.
(2) A new paragraph (3D) is added to read as follows:
“(3D) The rate of tax on the gross receipts from sales of or charges for food or
drink prepared for immediate consumption as defined in § 47-2001(g-1) shall be 5.0% from the
effective date of the Meals Tax Relief Amendment Act of 2026 to September 30, 2026, and 6.0%
beginning on October 1, 2027, and continuing thereafter.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).